District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0442.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
37 act may be cited as the “Interstate Social Work Licensure Compact Act of 2025”.
38 Sec. 2. Purpose
39 (a) The purpose of this Compact is to facilitate interstate practice of Regulated Social
40 Workers by improving public access to competent Social Work Services. The Compact preserves
1

41 the regulatory authority of States to protect public health and safety through the current system of
42 State licensure. This Compact is designed to achieve the following objectives:
43 (1) Increase public access to Social Work Services;
44 (2) Reduce overly burdensome and duplicative requirements associated with
45 holding multiple licenses;
46 (3) Enhance the Member States’ ability to protect the public’s health and safety;
47 (4) Encourage the cooperation of Member States in regulating multistate practice;
48 (5) Promote mobility and address workforce shortages by eliminating the necessity
49 for licenses in multiple States by providing for the mutual recognition of other Member State
50 licenses;
51 (6) Support military families;
52 (7) Facilitate the exchange of licensure and disciplinary information among
53 Member States;
54 (8) Authorize all Member States to hold a Regulated Social Worker accountable for
55 abiding by a Member State’s laws, regulations, and applicable professional standards in the
56 Member State in which the client is located at the time care is rendered; and
57 (9) Allow for the use of telehealth to facilitate increased access to regulated Social
58 Work Services.
59 Sec. 3. Definitions
60 (a) As used in this Compact, and except as otherwise provided, the following definitions
61 shall apply:
62 (1) “Active Military Member” means any individual with full-time duty status in
63 the active armed forces of the United States including members of the National Guard and Reserve.
2

64 (2) “Adverse Action” means any administrative, civil, equitable or criminal action
65 permitted by a State’s laws which is imposed by a Licensing Authority or other authority against
66 a Regulated Social Worker, including actions against an individual’s license or Multistate
67 Authorization to Practice such as revocation, suspension, probation, monitoring of the Licensee,
68 limitation on the Licensee’s practice, or any other Encumbrance on licensure affecting a Regulated
69 Social Worker’s authorization to practice, including issuance of a cease and desist action.
70 (3) “Alternative Program” means a non-disciplinary monitoring or practice
71 remediation process approved by a Licensing Authority to address practitioners with an
72 Impairment.
73 (4) “Charter Member States” - Member States who have enacted legislation to
74 adopt this Compact where such legislation predates the effective date of this Compact as described
75 in Section 14.
76 (5) “Compact Commission” or “Commission” means the government agency
77 whose membership consists of all States that have enacted this Compact, which is known as the
78 Social Work Licensure Compact Commission, as described in Section 10, and which shall operate
79 as an instrumentality of the Member States.
80 (6) “Current Significant Investigative Information” means:
81 (A) Investigative information that a Licensing Authority, after a preliminary
82 inquiry that includes notification and an opportunity for the Regulated Social Worker to respond
83 has reason to believe is not groundless and, if proved true, would indicate more than a minor
84 infraction as may be defined by the Commission; or
85 (B) Investigative information that indicates that the Regulated Social
86 Worker represents an immediate threat to public health and safety, as may be defined by the
3

87 Commission, regardless of whether the Regulated Social Worker has been notified and has had an
88 opportunity to respond.
89 (7) “Data System” means a repository of information about Licensees, including,
90 continuing education, examination, licensure, Current Significant Investigative Information,
91 Disqualifying Event, Multistate License(s) and Adverse Action information or other information
92 as required by the Commission.
93 (8) “Disqualifying Event” means any Adverse Action or incident which results in
94 an Encumbrance that disqualifies or makes the Licensee ineligible to either obtain, retain or renew
95 a Multistate License.
96 (9) “Domicile” means the jurisdiction in which the Licensee resides and intends to
97 remain indefinitely.
98 (10) “Encumbrance” means a revocation or suspension of, or any limitation on, the
99 full and unrestricted practice of Social Work licensed and regulated by a Licensing Authority.
100 (11) “Executive Committee” means a group of delegates elected or appointed to act
101 on behalf of, and within the powers granted to them by, the compact and Commission.
102 (12) “Home State” means the Member State that is the Licensee’s primary
103 Domicile.
104 (13) “Impairment” means a condition(s) that may impair a practitioner’s ability to
105 engage in full and unrestricted practice as a Regulated Social Worker without some type of
106 intervention and may include alcohol and drug dependence, mental health impairment, and
107 neurological or physical impairments.
108 (14) “Licensee(s)” means an individual who currently holds a license from a State
109 to practice as a Regulated Social Worker.
4

110 (15) “Licensing Authority” means the board or agency of a Member State, or
111 equivalent, that is responsible for the licensing and regulation of Regulated Social Workers.
112 (16) “Member State” means a state, commonwealth, district, or territory of the
113 United States of America that has enacted this Compact.
114 (17) “Multistate Authorization to Practice” means a legally authorized privilege to
115 practice, which is equivalent to a license, associated with a Multistate License permitting the
116 practice of Social Work in a Remote State.
117 (18) “Multistate License” means a license to practice as a Regulated Social Worker
118 issued by a Home State Licensing Authority that authorizes the Regulated Social Worker to
119 practice in all Member States under Multistate Authorization to Practice.
120 (19) “Qualifying National Exam” means a national licensing examination approved
121 by the Commission.
122 (20) “Regulated Social Worker” means any clinical, master’s or bachelor’s Social
123 Worker licensed by a Member State regardless of the title used by that Member State.
124 (21) “Remote State” means a Member State other than the Licensee’s Home State.
125 (22) “Rule(s)” or “Rule(s) of the Commission” means a regulation or regulations
126 duly promulgated by the Commission, as authorized by the Compact, that has the force of law.
127 (23) “Single State License” means a Social Work license issued by any State that
128 authorizes practice only within the issuing State and does not include Multistate Authorization to
129 Practice in any Member State.
130 (24) “Social Work” or “Social Work Services” means the application of social work
131 theory, knowledge, methods, ethics, and the professional use of self to restore or enhance social,
132 psychosocial, or biopsychosocial functioning of individuals, couples, families, groups,
5

133 organizations, and communities through the care and services provided by a Regulated Social
134 Worker as set forth in the Member State’s statutes and regulations in the State where the services
135 are being provided.
136 (25) “State” means any state, commonwealth, district, or territory of the United
137 States of America that regulates the practice of Social Work.
138 (26) “Unencumbered License” means a license that authorizes a Regulated Social
139 Worker to engage in the full and unrestricted practice of Social Work.
140 Sec. 4. State participation in the Compact
141 (a) To be eligible to participate in the compact, a potential Member State must currently
142 meet all of the following criteria:
143 (1) License and regulate the practice of Social Work at either the clinical, master’s,
144 or bachelor’s category.
145 (2) Require applicants for licensure to graduate from a program that is:
146 (A) Operated by a college or university recognized by the Licensing
147 Authority;
148 (B) Accredited, or in candidacy by an institution that subsequently becomes
149 accredited, by an accrediting agency recognized by either:
150 (i) the Council for Higher Education Accreditation, or its successor;
151 or
152 (ii) the United States Department of Education; and
153 (C) Corresponds to the licensure sought as outlined in Section 4.
154 (3) Require applicants for clinical licensure to complete a period of supervised
155 practice.
6

156 (4) Have a mechanism in place for receiving, investigating, and adjudicating
157 complaints about Licensees.
158 (b) To maintain membership in the Compact a Member State shall:
159 (1) Require that applicants for a Multistate License pass a Qualifying National
160 Exam for the corresponding category of Multistate License sought as outlined in Section 4.
161 (2) Participate fully in the Commission’s Data System, including using the
162 Commission’s unique identifier as defined in Rules;
163 (3) Notify the Commission, in compliance with the terms of the Compact and Rules,
164 of any Adverse Action or the availability of Current Significant Investigative Information
165 regarding a Licensee;
166 (4) Implement procedures for considering the criminal history records of applicants
167 for a Multistate License. Such procedures shall include the submission of fingerprints or other
168 biometric-based information by applicants for the purpose of obtaining an applicant’s criminal
169 history record information from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the agency responsible
170 for retaining that State’s criminal records.
171 (5) Comply with the Rules of the Commission;
172 (6) Require an applicant to obtain or retain a license in the Home State and meet
173 the Home State’s qualifications for licensure or renewal of licensure, as well as all other applicable
174 Home State laws;
175 (7) Authorize a Licensee holding a Multistate License in any Member State to
176 practice in accordance with the terms of the Compact and Rules of the Commission; and
177 (8) Designate a delegate to participate in the Commission meetings.
7

178 (c) A Member State meeting the requirements of Section 3.A. and 3.B of this Compact
179 shall designate the categories of Social Work licensure that are eligible for issuance of a Multistate
180 License for applicants in such Member State. To the extent that any Member State does not meet
181 the requirements for participation in the Compact at any particular category of Social Work
182 licensure, such Member State may choose, but is not obligated to, issue a Multistate License to
183 applicants that otherwise meet the requirements of Section 4 for issuance of a Multistate License
184 in such category or categories of licensure.
185 (d) The Home State may charge a fee for granting the Multistate License.
186 Sec. 5. Social worker participation in the Compact
187 (a) To be eligible for a Multistate License under the terms and provisions of the Compact,
188 an applicant, regardless of category must:
189 (1) Hold or be eligible for an active, Unencumbered License in the Home State;
190 (2) Pay any applicable fees, including any State fee, for the Multistate License;
191 (3) Submit, in connection with an application for a Multistate License, fingerprints
192 or other biometric data for the purpose of obtaining criminal history record information from the
193 Federal Bureau of Investigation and the agency responsible for retaining that State’s criminal
194 records.
195 (4) Notify the Home State of any Adverse Action, Encumbrance, or restriction on
196 any professional license taken by any Member State or non-Member State within 30 days from the
197 date the action is taken.
198 (5) Meet any continuing competence requirements established by the Home State;
199 (6) Abide by the laws, regulations, and applicable standards in the Member State
200 where the client is located at the time care is rendered.
8

201 (b) An applicant for a clinical-category Multistate License must meet all of the following
202 requirements:
203 (1) Fulfill a competency requirement, which shall be satisfied by either:
204 (A) Passage of a clinical-category Qualifying National Exam; or
205 (B) Licensure of the applicant in their Home State at the clinical category,
206 beginning prior to such time as a Qualifying National Exam was required by the Home State and
207 accompanied by a period of continuous Social Work licensure thereafter, all of which may be
208 further governed by the Rules of the Commission; or
209 (C) The substantial equivalency of the foregoing competency requirements
210 which the Commission may determine by Rule.
211 (2) Attain at least a master’s degree in Social Work from a program that is:
212 (A) Operated by a college or university recognized by the Licensing
213 Authority; and
214 (B) Accredited, or in candidacy that subsequently becomes accredited, by
215 an accrediting agency recognized by either:
216 (i) the Council for Higher Education Accreditation or its successor;
217 or
218 (ii) the United States Department of Education.
219 (3) Fulfill a practice requirement, which shall be satisfied by demonstrating
220 completion of either:
221 (A) A period of postgraduate supervised clinical practice equal to a
222 minimum of three thousand hours; or
9

223 (B) A minimum of two years of full-time postgraduate supervised clinical
224 practice; or
225 (C) The substantial equivalency of the foregoing practice requirements
226 which the Commission may determine by Rule.
227 (c) An applicant for a master’s-category Multistate License must meet all of the following
228 requirements:
229 (1) Fulfill a competency requirement, which shall be satisfied by either:
230 (A) Passage of a masters-category Qualifying National Exam;
231 (B) Licensure of the applicant in their Home State at the master’s category,
232 beginning prior to such time as a Qualifying National Exam was required by the Home State at the
233 master’s category and accompanied by a continuous period of Social Work licensure thereafter,
234 all of which may be further governed by the Rules of the Commission; or
235 (C) The substantial equivalency of the foregoing competency requirements
236 which the Commission may determine by Rule.
237 (2) Attain at least a master’s degree in Social Work from a program that is:
238 (A) Operated by a college or university recognized by the Licensing
239 Authority; and
240 (B) Accredited, or in candidacy that subsequently becomes accredited, by
241 an accrediting agency recognized by either:
242 (i) the Council for Higher Education Accreditation or its successor;
243 or
244 (ii) the United States Department of Education.
10

245 (d) An applicant for a bachelor’s-category Multistate License must meet all of the
246 following requirements:
247 (1) Fulfill a competency requirement, which shall be satisfied by either:
248 (A) Passage of a bachelor’s-category Qualifying National Exam;
249 (B) Licensure of the applicant in their Home State at the bachelor’s
250 category, beginning prior to such time as a Qualifying National Exam was required by the Home
251 State and accompanied by a period of continuous Social Work licensure thereafter, all of which
252 may be further governed by the Rules of the Commission; or
253 (C) The substantial equivalency of the foregoing competency requirements
254 which the Commission may determine by Rule.
255 (2) Attain at least a bachelor’s degree in Social Work from a program that is:
256 (A) Operated by a college or university recognized by the Licensing
257 Authority; and
258 (B) Accredited, or in candidacy that subsequently becomes accredited, by
259 an accrediting agency recognized by either:
260 (i) the Council for Higher Education Accreditation or its successor;
261 or
262 (ii) the United States Department of Education.
263 (e) The Multistate License for a Regulated Social Worker is subject to the renewal
264 requirements of the Home State. The Regulated Social Worker must maintain compliance with the
265 requirements of Section 4(A) to be eligible to renew a Multistate License.
266 (f) The Regulated Social Worker’s services in a Remote State are subject to that Member
267 State’s regulatory authority. A Remote State may, in accordance with due process and that Member
11

268 State’s laws, remove a Regulated Social Worker’s Multistate Authorization to Practice in the
269 Remote State for a specific period of time, impose fines, and take any other necessary actions to
270 protect the health and safety of its citizens.
271 (g) If a Multistate License is encumbered, the Regulated Social Worker’s Multistate
272 Authorization to Practice shall be deactivated in all Remote States until the Multistate License is
273 no longer encumbered.
274 (h) If a Multistate Authorization to Practice is encumbered in a Remote State, the regulated
275 Social Worker’s Multistate Authorization to Practice may be deactivated in that State until the
276 Multistate Authorization to Practice is no longer encumbered.
277 Sec. 6. Issuance of a multistate license
278 (a) Upon receipt of an application for Multistate License, the Home State Licensing
279 Authority shall determine the applicant’s eligibility for a Multistate License in accordance with
280 Section 4 of this Compact.
281 (b) If such applicant is eligible pursuant to Section 4 of this Compact, the Home State
282 Licensing Authority shall issue a Multistate License that authorizes the applicant or Regulated
283 Social Worker to practice in all Member States under a Multistate Authorization to Practice.
284 (c) Upon issuance of a Multistate License, the Home State Licensing Authority shall
285 designate whether the Regulated Social Worker holds a Multistate License in the Bachelors,
286 Masters, or Clinical category of Social Work.
287 (d) A Multistate License issued by a Home State to a resident in that State shall be
288 recognized by all Compact Member States as authorizing Social Work Practice under a Multistate
289 Authorization to Practice corresponding to each category of licensure regulated in each Member
290 State.
12

291 Sec. 7. Authority of interstate compact commission and member state licensing authorities
292 (a) Nothing in this Compact, nor any Rule of the Commission, shall be construed to limit,
293 restrict, or in any way reduce the ability of a Member State to enact and enforce laws, regulations,
294 or other rules related to the practice of Social Work in that State, where those laws, regulations, or
295 other rules are not inconsistent with the provisions of this Compact.
296 (b) Nothing in this Compact shall affect the requirements established by a Member State
297 for the issuance of a Single State License.
298 (c) Nothing in this Compact, nor any Rule of the Commission, shall be construed to limit,
299 restrict, or in any way reduce the ability of a Member State to take Adverse Action against a
300 Licensee’s Single State License to practice Social Work in that State.
301 (d) Nothing in this Compact, nor any Rule of the Commission, shall be construed to limit,
302 restrict, or in any way reduce the ability of a Remote State to take Adverse Action against a
303 Licensee’s Multistate Authorization to Practice in that State.
304 (e) Nothing in this Compact, nor any Rule of the Commission, shall be construed to limit,
305 restrict, or in any way reduce the ability of a Licensee’s Home State to take Adverse Action against
306 a Licensee’s Multistate License based upon information provided by a Remote State.
307 Sec. 8. Reissuance of a multistate license by a new home state
308 (a) A Licensee can hold a Multistate License, issued by their Home State, in only one
309 Member State at any given time.
310 (b) If a Licensee changes their Home State by moving between two Member States:
311 (1) The Licensee shall immediately apply for the reissuance of their Multistate
312 License in their new Home State. The Licensee shall pay all applicable fees and notify the prior
313 Home State in accordance with the Rules of the Commission.
13

314 (2) Upon receipt of an application to reissue a Multistate License, the new Home
315 State shall verify that the Multistate License is active, unencumbered and eligible for reissuance
316 under the terms of the Compact and the Rules of the Commission. The Multistate License issued
317 by the prior Home State will be deactivated and all Member States notified in accordance with the
318 applicable Rules adopted by the Commission.
319 (3) Prior to the reissuance of the Multistate License, the new Home State shall
320 conduct procedures for considering the criminal history records of the Licensee. Such procedures
321 shall include the submission of fingerprints or other biometric-based information by applicants for
322 the purpose of obtaining an applicant’s criminal history record information from the Federal
323 Bureau of Investigation and the agency responsible for retaining that State’s criminal records.
324 (4) If required for initial licensure, the new Home State may require completion of
325 jurisprudence requirements in the new Home State.
326 (5) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Compact, if a Licensee does not
327 meet the requirements set forth in this Compact for the reissuance of a Multistate License by the
328 new Home State, then the Licensee shall be subject to the new Home State requirements for the
329 issuance of a Single State License in that State.
330 (c) If a Licensee changes their primary State of residence by moving from a Member State
331 to a non-Member State, or from a non-Member State to a Member State, then the Licensee shall
332 be subject to the State requirements for the issuance of a Single State License in the new Home
333 State.
334 (d) Nothing in this Compact shall interfere with a Licensee’s ability to hold a Single State
335 License in multiple States; however, for the purposes of this Compact, a Licensee shall have only
336 one Home State, and only one Multistate License.
14

337 (e) Nothing in this Compact shall interfere with the requirements established by a Member
338 State for the issuance of a Single State License.
339 Sec. 9. Military families
340 (a) An Active Military Member or their spouse shall designate a Home State where the
341 individual has a Multistate License. The individual may retain their Home State designation during
342 the period the service member is on active duty.
343 Sec. 10. Adverse actions
344 (a) In addition to the other powers conferred by State law, a Remote State shall have the
345 authority, in accordance with existing State due process law, to:
346 (1) Take Adverse Action against a Regulated Social Worker’s Multistate
347 Authorization to Practice only within that Member State, and issue subpoenas for both hearings
348 and investigations that require the attendance and testimony of witnesses as well as the production
349 of evidence. Subpoenas issued by a Licensing Authority in a Member State for the attendance and
350 testimony of witnesses or the production of evidence from another Member State shall be enforced
351 in the latter State by any court of competent jurisdiction, according to the practice and procedure
352 of that court applicable to subpoenas issued in proceedings pending before it. The issuing
353 Licensing Authority shall pay any witness fees, travel expenses, mileage, and other fees required
354 by the service statutes of the State in which the witnesses or evidence are located.
355 (2) Only the Home State shall have the power to take Adverse Action against a
356 Regulated Social Worker’s Multistate License.
357 (b) For purposes of taking Adverse Action, the Home State shall give the same priority and
358 effect to reported conduct received from a Member State as it would if the conduct had occurred
15

359 within the Home State. In so doing, the Home State shall apply its own State laws to determine
360 appropriate action.
361 (c) The Home State shall complete any pending investigations of a Regulated Social
362 Worker who changes their Home State during the course of the investigations. The Home State
363 shall also have the authority to take appropriate action(s) and shall promptly report the conclusions
364 of the investigations to the administrator of the Data System. The administrator of the Data System
365 shall promptly notify the new Home State of any Adverse Actions.
366 (d) A Member State, if otherwise permitted by State law, may recover from the affected
367 Regulated Social Worker the costs of investigations and dispositions of cases resulting from any
368 Adverse Action taken against that Regulated Social Worker.
369 (e) A Member State may take Adverse Action based on the factual findings of another
370 Member State, provided that the Member State follows its own procedures for taking the Adverse
371 Action.
372 (f) Joint Investigations:
373 (1) In addition to the authority granted to a Member State by its respective Social
374 Work practice act or other applicable State law, any Member State may participate with other
375 Member States in joint investigations of Licensees.
376 (2) Member States shall share any investigative, litigation, or compliance materials
377 in furtherance of any joint or individual investigation initiated under the Compact.
378 (g) If Adverse Action is taken by the Home State against the Multistate License of a
379 Regulated Social Worker, the Regulated Social Worker’s Multistate Authorization to Practice in
380 all other Member States shall be deactivated until all Encumbrances have been removed from the
381 Multistate License. All Home State disciplinary orders that impose Adverse Action against the
16

382 license of a Regulated Social Worker shall include a statement that the Regulated Social Worker’s
383 Multistate Authorization to Practice is deactivated in all Member States until all conditions of the
384 decision, order or agreement are satisfied.
385 (h) If a Member State takes Adverse Action, it shall promptly notify the administrator of
386 the Data System. The administrator of the Data System shall promptly notify the Home State and
387 all other Member State’s of any Adverse Actions by Remote States.
388 (i) Nothing in this Compact shall override a Member State’s decision that participation in
389 an Alternative Program may be used in lieu of Adverse Action.
390 (j) Nothing in this Compact shall authorize a Member State to demand the issuance of
391 subpoenas for attendance and testimony of witnesses or the production of evidence from another
392 Member State for lawful actions within that Member State.
393 (k) Nothing in this Compact shall authorize a Member State to impose discipline against a
394 Regulated Social Worker who holds a Multistate Authorization to Practice for lawful actions
395 within another Member State.
396 Sec. 11. Establishment of a social work licensure compact commission
397 (a) The Compact Member States hereby create and establish a joint government agency
398 whose membership consists of all Member States that have enacted the compact known as the
399 Social Work Licensure Compact Commission. The Commission is an instrumentality of the
400 Compact States acting jointly and not an instrumentality of any one State. The Commission shall
401 come into existence on or after the effective date of the Compact as set forth in Section 14.
402 (b) Membership, Voting, and Meetings
403 (1) Each Member State shall have and be limited to one (1) delegate selected by
404 that Member State’s State Licensing Authority.
17

405 (2) The delegate shall be either:
406 (A) A current member of the State Licensing Authority at the time of
407 appointment, who is a Regulated Social Worker or public member of the State Licensing
408 Authority; or
409 (B) An administrator of the State Licensing Authority or their designee.
410 (3) The Commission shall by Rule or bylaw establish a term of office for delegates
411 and may by Rule or bylaw establish term limits.
412 (4) The Commission may recommend removal or suspension any delegate from
413 office.
414 (5) A Member State’s State Licensing Authority shall fill any vacancy of its
415 delegate occurring on the Commission within 60 days of the vacancy.
416 (6) Each delegate shall be entitled to one vote on all matters before the Commission
417 requiring a vote by Commission delegates.
418 (7) A delegate shall vote in person or by such other means as provided in the
419 bylaws. The bylaws may provide for delegates to meet by telecommunication, videoconference,
420 or other means of communication.
421 (8) The Commission shall meet at least once during each calendar year. Additional
422 meetings may be held as set forth in the bylaws. The Commission may meet by telecommunication,
423 video conference or other similar electronic means.
424 (c) The Commission shall have the following powers:
425 (1) Establish the fiscal year of the Commission;
426 (2) Establish code of conduct and conflict of interest policies;
427 (3) Establish and amend Rules and bylaws;
18

428 (4) Maintain its financial records in accordance with the bylaws;
429 (5) Meet and take such actions as are consistent with the provisions of this Compact,
430 the Commission’s Rules, and the bylaws;
431 (6) Initiate and conclude legal proceedings or actions in the name of the
432 Commission, provided that the standing of any State Licensing Board to sue or be sued under
433 applicable law shall not be affected;
434 (7) Maintain and certify records and information provided to a Member State as the
435 authenticated business records of the Commission, and designate an agent to do so on the
436 Commission's behalf;
437 (8) Purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;
438 (9) Borrow, accept, or contract for services of personnel, including, but not limited
439 to, employees of a Member State;
440 (10) Conduct an annual financial review
441 (11) Hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix compensation, define duties,
442 grant such individuals appropriate authority to carry out the purposes of the Compact, and establish
443 the Commission’s personnel policies and programs relating to conflicts of interest, qualifications
444 of personnel, and other related personnel matters;
445 (12) Assess and collect fees;
446 (13) Accept any and all appropriate gifts, donations, grants of money, other sources
447 of revenue, equipment, supplies, materials, and services, and receive, utilize, and dispose of the
448 same; provided that at all times the Commission shall avoid any appearance of impropriety or
449 conflict of interest;
19

450 (14) Lease, purchase, retain, own, hold, improve, or use any property, real,
451 personal, or mixed, or any undivided interest therein;
452 (15) Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon, or otherwise
453 dispose of any property real, personal, or mixed;
454 (16) Establish a budget and make expenditures;
455 (17) Borrow money;
456 (18) Appoint committees, including standing committees, composed of members,
457 State regulators, State legislators or their representatives, and consumer representatives, and such
458 other interested persons as may be designated in this Compact and the bylaws;
459 (19) Provide and receive information from, and cooperate with, law enforcement
460 agencies;
461 (20) Establish and elect an Executive Committee, including a chair and a vice chair;
462 (21) Determine whether a State’s adopted language is materially different from the
463 model compact language such that the State would not qualify for participation in the Compact;
464 and
465 (22) Perform such other functions as may be necessary or appropriate to achieve
466 the purposes of this Compact.
467 (d) The Executive Committee
468 (1) The Executive Committee shall have the power to act on behalf of the
469 Commission according to the terms of this Compact. The powers, duties, and responsibilities of
470 the Executive Committee shall include:
20

471 (A) Oversee the day-to-day activities of the administration of the compact
472 including enforcement and compliance with the provisions of the compact, its Rules and bylaws,
473 and other such duties as deemed necessary;
474 (B) Recommend to the Commission changes to the Rules or bylaws,
475 changes to this Compact legislation, fees charged to Compact Member States, fees charged to
476 Licensees, and other fees;
477 (C) Ensure Compact administration services are appropriately provided,
478 including by contract;
479 (D) Prepare and recommend the budget;
480 (E) Maintain financial records on behalf of the Commission;
481 (F) Monitor Compact compliance of Member States and provide
482 compliance reports to the Commission;
483 (G) Establish additional committees as necessary;
484 (H) Exercise the powers and duties of the Commission during the interim
485 between Commission meetings, except for adopting or amending Rules, adopting or amending
486 bylaws, and exercising any other powers and duties expressly reserved to the Commission by Rule
487 or bylaw; and
488 (I) Other duties as provided in the Rules or bylaws of the Commission.
489 (2) The Executive Committee shall be composed of up to eleven (11) members:
490 (A) The chair and vice chair of the Commission shall be voting members of
491 the Executive Committee; and
492 (B) The Commission shall elect five voting members from the current
493 membership of the Commission.
21

494 (C) Up to four (4) ex-officio, nonvoting members from four (4) recognized
495 national Social Work organizations.
496 (D) The ex-officio members will be selected by their respective
497 organizations.
498 (3) The Commission may remove any member of the Executive Committee as
499 provided in the Commission’s bylaws.
500 (4) The Executive Committee shall meet at least annually.
501 (A) Executive Committee meetings shall be open to the public, except that
502 the Executive Committee may meet in a closed, non-public meeting as provided in subsection F.2
503 below.
504 (B) The Executive Committee shall give seven (7) days’ notice of its
505 meetings, posted on its website and as determined to provide notice to persons with an interest in
506 the business of the Commission.
507 (C) The Executive Committee may hold a special meeting in accordance with
508 subsection F.1.b. below.
509 (e) The Commission shall adopt and provide to the Member States an annual report.
510 (f) Meetings of the Commission
511 (1) All meetings shall be open to the public, except that the Commission may meet
512 in a closed, non-public meeting as provided in subsection F.2 below.
513 (A) Public notice for all meetings of the full Commission of meetings shall
514 be given in the same manner as required under the Rulemaking provisions in Section 12, except
515 that the Commission may hold a special meeting as provided in subsection F.1.b below.
22

516 (B) The Commission may hold a special meeting when it must meet to
517 conduct emergency business by giving 48 hours’ notice to all commissioners, on the Commission’s
518 website, and other means as provided in the Commission’s Rules. The Commission’s legal counsel
519 shall certify that the Commission’s need to meet qualifies as an emergency.
520 (2) The Commission or the Executive Committee or other committees of the
521 Commission may convene in a closed, non-public meeting for the Commission or Executive
522 Committee or other committees of the Commission to receive legal advice or to discuss:
523 (A) Non-compliance of a Member State with its obligations under the
524 Compact;
525 (B) The employment, compensation, discipline or other matters, practices
526 or procedures related to specific employees;
527 (C) Current or threatened discipline of a Licensee by the Commission or by
528 a Member State’s Licensing Authority;
529 (D) Current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated litigation;
530 (E) Negotiation of contracts for the purchase, lease, or sale of goods,
531 services, or real estate;
532 (F) Accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring any person;
533 (G) Trade secrets or commercial or financial information that is privileged
534 or confidential;
535 (H) Information of a personal nature where disclosure would constitute a
536 clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy;
537 (I) Investigative records compiled for law enforcement purposes;
23

538 (J) Information related to any investigative reports prepared by or on behalf
539 of or for use of the Commission or other committee charged with responsibility of investigation or
540 determination of compliance issues pursuant to the Compact;
541 (K) Matters specifically exempted from disclosure by federal or Member
542 State law; or
543 (L) Other matters as promulgated by the Commission by Rule.
544 (3) If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed, the presiding officer shall state
545 that the meeting will be closed and reference each relevant exempting provision, and such
546 reference shall be recorded in the minutes.
547 (4) The Commission shall keep minutes that fully and clearly describe all matters
548 discussed in a meeting and shall provide a full and accurate summary of actions taken, and the
549 reasons therefore, including a description of the views expressed. All documents considered in
550 connection with an action shall be identified in such minutes. All minutes and documents of a
551 closed meeting shall remain under seal, subject to release only by a majority vote of the
552 Commission or order of a court of competent jurisdiction.
553 (g) Financing of the Commission
554 (1) The Commission shall pay, or provide for the payment of, the reasonable
555 expenses of its establishment, organization, and ongoing activities.
556 (2) The Commission may accept any and all appropriate revenue sources as
557 provided in subsection C(13).
558 (3) The Commission may levy on and collect an annual assessment from each
559 Member State and impose fees on Licensees of Member States to whom it grants a Multistate
560 License to cover the cost of the operations and activities of the Commission and its staff, which
24

561 must be in a total amount sufficient to cover its annual budget as approved each year for which
562 revenue is not provided by other sources. The aggregate annual assessment amount for Member
563 States shall be allocated based upon a formula that the Commission shall promulgate by Rule.
564 (4) The Commission shall not incur obligations of any kind prior to securing the
565 funds adequate to meet the same; nor shall the Commission pledge the credit of any of the Member
566 States, except by and with the authority of the Member State.
567 (5) The Commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and disbursements.
568 The receipts and disbursements of the Commission shall be subject to the financial review and
569 accounting procedures established under its bylaws. However, all receipts and disbursements of
570 funds handled by the Commission shall be subject to an annual financial review by a certified or
571 licensed public accountant, and the report of the financial review shall be included in and become
572 part of the annual report of the Commission.
573 (h) Qualified Immunity, Defense, and Indemnification
574 (1) The members, officers, executive director, employees and representatives of the
575 Commission shall be immune from suit and liability, both personally and in their official capacity,
576 for any claim for damage to or loss of property or personal injury or other civil liability caused by
577 or arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred, or that the person
578 against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of
579 Commission employment, duties or responsibilities; provided that nothing in this paragraph shall
580 be construed to protect any such person from suit or liability for any damage, loss, injury, or
581 liability caused by the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that person. The procurement
582 of insurance of any type by the Commission shall not in any way compromise or limit the immunity
583 granted hereunder.
25

584 (2) The Commission shall defend any member, officer, executive director,
585 employee, and representative of the Commission in any civil action seeking to impose liability
586 arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred within the scope of
587 Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or as determined by the Commission that the
588 person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the
589 scope of Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities; provided that nothing herein shall
590 be construed to prohibit that person from retaining their own counsel at their own expense; and
591 provided further, that the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not result from that person’s
592 intentional or willful or wanton misconduct.
593 (3) The Commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any member, officer,
594 executive director, employee, and representative of the Commission for the amount of any
595 settlement or judgment obtained against that person arising out of any actual or alleged act, error,
596 or omission that occurred within the scope of Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities,
597 or that such person had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of Commission
598 employment, duties, or responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged act, error, or omission
599 did not result from the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that person.
600 (4) Nothing herein shall be construed as a limitation on the liability of any Licensee
601 for professional malpractice or misconduct, which shall be governed solely by any other applicable
602 State laws.
603 (5) Nothing in this Compact shall be interpreted to waive or otherwise abrogate a
604 Member State’s state action immunity or state action affirmative defense with respect to antitrust
605 claims under the Sherman Act, Clayton Act, or any other State or federal antitrust or
606 anticompetitive law or regulation.
26

607 (6) Nothing in this Compact shall be construed to be a waiver of sovereign
608 immunity by the Member States or by the Commission.
609 Sec. 12. Data system
610 (a) The Commission shall provide for the development, maintenance, operation, and
611 utilization of a coordinated Data System.
612 (b) The Commission shall assign each applicant for a Multistate License a unique identifier,
613 as determined by the Rules of the Commission.
614 (c) Notwithstanding any other provision of State law to the contrary, a Member State shall
615 submit a uniform data set to the Data System on all individuals to whom this Compact is applicable
616 as required by the Rules of the Commission, including:
617 (1) Identifying information;
618 (2) Licensure data;
619 (3) Adverse Actions against a license and information related thereto;
620 (4) Non-confidential information related to Alternative Program participation, the
621 beginning and ending dates of such participation, and other information related to such
622 participation not made confidential under Member State law;
623 (5) Any denial of application for licensure, and the reason(s) for such denial;
624 (6) The presence of Current Significant Investigative Information; and
625 (7) Other information that may facilitate the administration of this Compact or the
626 protection of the public, as determined by the Rules of the Commission.
627 (d) The records and information provided to a Member State pursuant to this Compact or
628 through the Data System, when certified by the Commission or an agent thereof, shall constitute
629 the authenticated business records of the Commission, and shall be entitled to any associated
27

630 hearsay exception in any relevant judicial, quasi-judicial or administrative proceedings in a
631 Member State.
632 (e) Current Significant Investigative Information pertaining to a Licensee in any Member
633 State will only be available to other Member States.
634 (1) It is the responsibility of the Member States to report any Adverse Action
635 against a Licensee and to monitor the database to determine whether Adverse Action has been
636 taken against a Licensee. Adverse Action information pertaining to a Licensee in any Member
637 State will be available to any other Member State.
638 (f) Member States contributing information to the Data System may designate information
639 that may not be shared with the public without the express permission of the contributing State.
640 (g) Any information submitted to the Data System that is subsequently expunged pursuant
641 to federal law or the laws of the Member State contributing the information shall be removed from
642 the Data System.
643 Sec. 13. Rulemaking
644 (a) The Commission shall promulgate reasonable Rules in order to effectively and
645 efficiently implement and administer the purposes and provisions of the Compact. A Rule shall be
646 invalid and have no force or effect only if a court of competent jurisdiction holds that the Rule is
647 invalid because the Commission exercised its rulemaking authority in a manner that is beyond the
648 scope and purposes of the Compact, or the powers granted hereunder, or based upon another
649 applicable standard of review.
650 (b) The Rules of the Commission shall have the force of law in each Member State,
651 provided however that where the Rules of the Commission conflict with the laws of the Member
652 State that establish the Member State’s laws, regulations, and applicable standards that govern the
28

653 practice of Social Work as held by a court of competent jurisdiction, the Rules of the Commission
654 shall be ineffective in that State to the extent of the conflict.
655 (c) The Commission shall exercise its Rulemaking powers pursuant to the criteria set forth
656 in this Section and the Rules adopted thereunder. Rules shall become binding on the day following
657 adoption or the date specified in the rule or amendment, whichever is later.
658 (d) If a majority of the legislatures of the Member States rejects a Rule or portion of a Rule,
659 by enactment of a statute or resolution in the same manner used to adopt the Compact within four
660 (4) years of the date of adoption of the Rule, then such Rule shall have no further force and effect
661 in any Member State.
662 (e) Rules shall be adopted at a regular or special meeting of the Commission.
663 (f) Prior to adoption of a proposed Rule, the Commission shall hold a public hearing and
664 allow persons to provide oral and written comments, data, facts, opinions, and arguments.
665 (g) Prior to adoption of a proposed Rule by the Commission, and at least thirty (30) days
666 in advance of the meeting at which the Commission will hold a public hearing on the proposed
667 Rule, the Commission shall provide a Notice of Proposed Rulemaking:
668 (1) On the website of the Commission or other publicly accessible platform;
669 (2) To persons who have requested notice of the Commission’s notices of proposed
670 rulemaking, and
671 (3) In such other way(s) as the Commission may by Rule specify.
672 (h) The Notice of Proposed Rulemaking shall include:
673 (1) The time, date, and location of the public hearing at which the Commission will
674 hear public comments on the proposed Rule and, if different, the time, date, and location of the
675 meeting where the Commission will consider and vote on the proposed Rule;
29

676 (2) If the hearing is held via telecommunication, video conference, or other
677 electronic means, the Commission shall include the mechanism for access to the hearing in the
678 Notice of Proposed Rulemaking;
679 (3) The text of the proposed Rule and the reason therefor;
680 (4) A request for comments on the proposed Rule from any interested person; and
681 (5) The manner in which interested persons may submit written comments.
682 (i) All hearings will be recorded. A copy of the recording and all written comments and
683 documents received by the Commission in response to the proposed Rule shall be available to the
684 public.
685 (j) Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a separate hearing on each Rule.
686 Rules may be grouped for the convenience of the Commission at hearings required by this section.
687 (k) The Commission shall, by majority vote of all members, take final action on the
688 proposed Rule based on the Rulemaking record and the full text of the Rule.
689 (1) The Commission may adopt changes to the proposed Rule provided the changes
690 do not enlarge the original purpose of the proposed Rule.
691 (2) The Commission shall provide an explanation of the reasons for substantive
692 changes made to the proposed Rule as well as reasons for substantive changes not made that were
693 recommended by commenters.
694 (3) The Commission shall determine a reasonable effective date for the Rule.
695 Except for an emergency as provided in Section 12.L, the effective date of the rule shall be no
696 sooner than 30 days after issuing the notice that it adopted or amended the Rule.
697 (l) Upon determination that an emergency exists, the Commission may consider and adopt
698 an emergency Rule with 48 hours’ notice, with opportunity to comment, provided that the usual
30

699 Rulemaking procedures provided in the Compact and in this section shall be retroactively applied
700 to the Rule as soon as reasonably possible, in no event later than ninety (90) days after the effective
701 date of the Rule. For the purposes of this provision, an emergency Rule is one that must be adopted
702 immediately in order to:
703 (1) Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or welfare;
704 (2) Prevent a loss of Commission or Member State funds;
705 (3) Meet a deadline for the promulgation of a Rule that is established by federal law
706 or rule; or
707 (4) Protect public health and safety.
708 (m) The Commission or an authorized committee of the Commission may direct revisions
709 to a previously adopted Rule for purposes of correcting typographical errors, errors in format,
710 errors in consistency, or grammatical errors. Public notice of any revisions shall be posted on the
711 website of the Commission. The revision shall be subject to challenge by any person for a period
712 of thirty (30) days after posting. The revision may be challenged only on grounds that the revision
713 results in a material change to a Rule. A challenge shall be made in writing and delivered to the
714 Commission prior to the end of the notice period. If no challenge is made, the revision will take
715 effect without further action. If the revision is challenged, the revision may not take effect without
716 the approval of the Commission.
717 (n) No Member State’s rulemaking requirements shall apply under this compact.
718 Sec. 14. Oversight, dispute resolution, and enforcement
719 (a) Oversight
31

720 (1) The executive and judicial branches of State government in each Member State
721 shall enforce this Compact and take all actions necessary and appropriate to implement the
722 Compact.
723 (2) Except as otherwise provided in this Compact, venue is proper and judicial
724 proceedings by or against the Commission shall be brought solely and exclusively in a court of
725 competent jurisdiction where the principal office of the Commission is located. The Commission
726 may waive venue and jurisdictional defenses to the extent it adopts or consents to participate in
727 alternative dispute resolution proceedings. Nothing herein shall affect or limit the selection or
728 propriety of venue in any action against a Licensee for professional malpractice, misconduct or
729 any such similar matter.
730 (3) The Commission shall be entitled to receive service of process in any
731 proceeding regarding the enforcement or interpretation of the Compact and shall have standing to
732 intervene in such a proceeding for all purposes. Failure to provide the Commission service of
733 process shall render a judgment or order void as to the Commission, this Compact, or promulgated
734 Rules.
735 (b) Default, Technical Assistance, and Termination
736 (1) If the Commission determines that a Member State has defaulted in the
737 performance of its obligations or responsibilities under this Compact or the promulgated Rules,
738 the Commission shall provide written notice to the defaulting State. The notice of default shall
739 describe the default, the proposed means of curing the default, and any other action that the
740 Commission may take, and shall offer training and specific technical assistance regarding the
741 default.
32

742 (2) The Commission shall provide a copy of the notice of default to the other
743 Member States.
744 (c) If a State in default fails to cure the default, the defaulting State may be terminated from
745 the Compact upon an affirmative vote of a majority of the delegates of the Member States, and all
746 rights, privileges and benefits conferred on that State by this Compact may be terminated on the
747 effective date of termination. A cure of the default does not relieve the offending State of
748 obligations or liabilities incurred during the period of default.
749 (d) Termination of membership in the Compact shall be imposed only after all other means
750 of securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend or terminate shall be
751 given by the Commission to the governor, the majority and minority leaders of the defaulting
752 State’s legislature, the defaulting State’s State Licensing Authority and each of the Member States’
753 State Licensing Authority.
754 (e) A State that has been terminated is responsible for all assessments, obligations, and
755 liabilities incurred through the effective date of termination, including obligations that extend
756 beyond the effective date of termination.
757 (f) Upon the termination of a State’s membership from this Compact, that State shall
758 immediately provide notice to all Licensees within that State of such termination. The terminated
759 State shall continue to recognize all licenses granted pursuant to this Compact for a minimum of
760 six (6) months after the date of said notice of termination.
761 (g) The Commission shall not bear any costs related to a State that is found to be in default
762 or that has been terminated from the Compact, unless agreed upon in writing between the
763 Commission and the defaulting State.
33

764 (h) The defaulting State may appeal the action of the Commission by petitioning the U.S.
765 District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district where the Commission has its
766 principal offices. The prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including
767 reasonable attorney’s fees.
768 (i) Dispute Resolution
769 (1) Upon request by a Member State, the Commission shall attempt to resolve
770 disputes related to the Compact that arise among Member States and between Member and non-
771 Member States.
772 (2) The Commission shall promulgate a Rule providing for both mediation and
773 binding dispute resolution for disputes as appropriate.
774 (j) Enforcement
775 (1) By majority vote as provided by Rule, the Commission may initiate legal action
776 against a Member State in default in the United States District Court for the District of Columbia
777 or the federal district where the Commission has its principal offices to enforce compliance with
778 the provisions of the Compact and its promulgated Rules. The relief sought may include both
779 injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party
780 shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney’s fees. The remedies
781 herein shall not be the exclusive remedies of the Commission. The Commission may pursue any
782 other remedies available under federal or the defaulting Member State’s law.
783 (2) A Member State may initiate legal action against the Commission in the U.S.
784 District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district where the Commission has its
785 principal offices to enforce compliance with the provisions of the Compact and its promulgated
786 Rules. The relief sought may include both injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial
34

787 enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation,
788 including reasonable attorney’s fees.
789 (3) No person other than a Member State shall enforce this compact against the
790 Commission.
791 Sec. 15. Effective date, withdrawal, and amendment
792 (a) The Compact shall come into effect on the date on which the Compact statute is enacted
793 into law in the seventh Member State.
794 (1) On or after the effective date of the Compact, the Commission shall convene
795 and review the enactment of each of the first seven Member States (“Charter Member States”) to
796 determine if the statute enacted by each such Charter Member State is materially different than the
797 model Compact statute.
798 (A) A Charter Member State whose enactment is found to be materially
799 different from the model Compact statute shall be entitled to the default process set forth in Section
800 13.
801 (B) If any Member State is later found to be in default, or is terminated or
802 withdraws from the Compact, the Commission shall remain in existence and the Compact shall
803 remain in effect even if the number of Member States should be less than seven.
804 (2) Member States enacting the Compact subsequent to the seven initial Charter
805 Member States shall be subject to the process set forth in Section 10(C)(21) to determine if their
806 enactments are materially different from the model Compact statute and whether they qualify for
807 participation in the Compact.
808 (3) All actions taken for the benefit of the Commission or in furtherance of the
809 purposes of the administration of the Compact prior to the effective date of the Compact or the
35

810 Commission coming into existence shall be considered to be actions of the Commission unless
811 specifically repudiated by the Commission.
812 (4) Any State that joins the Compact subsequent to the Commission’s initial
813 adoption of the Rules and bylaws shall be subject to the Rules and bylaws as they exist on the date
814 on which the Compact becomes law in that State. Any Rule that has been previously adopted by
815 the Commission shall have the full force and effect of law on the day the Compact becomes law
816 in that State.
817 (b) Any Member State may withdraw from this Compact by enacting a statute repealing
818 the same.
819 (1) A Member State’s withdrawal shall not take effect until 180 days after
820 enactment of the repealing statute.
821 (2) Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing requirement of the withdrawing
822 State’s Licensing Authority to comply with the investigative and Adverse Action reporting
823 requirements of this Compact prior to the effective date of withdrawal.
824 (3) Upon the enactment of a statute withdrawing from this compact, a State shall
825 immediately provide notice of such withdrawal to all Licensees within that State. Notwithstanding
826 any subsequent statutory enactment to the contrary, such withdrawing State shall continue to
827 recognize all licenses granted pursuant to this compact for a minimum of 180 days after the date
828 of such notice of withdrawal.
829 (c) Nothing contained in this Compact shall be construed to invalidate or prevent any
830 licensure agreement or other cooperative arrangement between a Member State and a non-Member
831 State that does not conflict with the provisions of this Compact.
36

832 (d) This Compact may be amended by the Member States. No amendment to this Compact
833 shall become effective and binding upon any Member State until it is enacted into the laws of all
834 Member States.
835 Sec. 16. Construction and severability
836 (a) This Compact and the Commission’s rulemaking authority shall be liberally construed
837 so as to effectuate the purposes, and the implementation and administration of the Compact.
838 Provisions of the Compact expressly authorizing or requiring the promulgation of Rules shall not
839 be construed to limit the Commission’s rulemaking authority solely for those purposes.
840 (b) The provisions of this Compact shall be severable and if any phrase, clause, sentence
841 or provision of this Compact is held by a court of competent jurisdiction to be contrary to the
842 constitution of any Member State, a State seeking participation in the Compact, or of the United
843 States, or the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person or circumstance is held to
844 be unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, the validity of the remainder of this
845 Compact and the applicability thereof to any other government, agency, person or circumstance
846 shall not be affected thereby.
847 (c) Notwithstanding subsection B of this section, the Commission may deny a State’s
848 participation in the Compact or, in accordance with the requirements of Section 13.B, terminate a
849 Member State’s participation in the Compact, if it determines that a constitutional requirement of
850 a Member State is a material departure from the Compact. Otherwise, if this Compact shall be
851 held to be contrary to the constitution of any Member State, the Compact shall remain in full force
852 and effect as to the remaining Member States and in full force and effect as to the Member State
853 affected as to all severable matters.
854 Sec. 17. Consistent effect and conflict with other state laws
37

855 (a) A Licensee providing services in a Remote State under a Multistate Authorization to
856 Practice shall adhere to the laws and regulations, including laws, regulations, and applicable
857 standards, of the Remote State where the client is located at the time care is rendered.
858 (b) Nothing herein shall prevent or inhibit the enforcement of any other law of a Member
859 State that is not inconsistent with the Compact.
860 (c) Any laws, statutes, regulations, or other legal requirements in a Member State in conflict
861 with the Compact are superseded to the extent of the conflict.
862 (d) All permissible agreements between the Commission and the Member States are
863 binding in accordance with their terms.
864 Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
865 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal impact
866 statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
867 October 16, 2006 (12 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
868 Sec. 4. Effective date.
869 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
870 Mayor, action by the Council overriding the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review as
871 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24,
872 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
38